Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-118.05
Third-party claims; Workers' Compensation Trust Fund; subrogation rights.

In any case in which an injured employee is entitled to benefits from the Workers' Compensation Trust Fund for injuries occurring before December 1, 1997, as provided in section 48-128 and recovery is had against the third party liable to the employee for the injury, the Workers' Compensation Trust Fund shall be subrogated to the rights of the employee against such third party to the extent of the benefits due to him or her or which shall become due to him or her from such fund, subject to the rights of the employer and his or her workers' compensation insurer.

Laws 2005, LB 13, § 27.